District of Columbia statutes.
6-1114

Severability.

The sections of this subchapter are hereby declared to be severable. In the event that any section of this subchapter or portion thereof is held void or unenforceable for whatever reason, all remaining provisions shall remain in full force and effect.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 16, 25 DCR 6939
1981 Ed., § 5-1014.
1973 Ed., § 5-834.
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 5-69 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 11 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter,” where applicable, in this section.